Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8315. BURNET COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 3

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8315.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Burnet County Municipal Utility District No. 3.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.003. CONFIRMATION AND DIRECTORS' ELECTION REQUIRED. The temporary directors shall hold an election to confirm the creation of the district and to elect five permanent directors as provided by Section 49.102, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.004. CONSENT OF MUNICIPALITY REQUIRED. (a) The temporary directors may not hold an election under Section 8315.003 until each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located has consented by ordinance or resolution to the creation of the district and to the inclusion of land in the district.

(b) A municipality may not provide consent under Subsection (a) until the municipality and the owner or owners of the territory described by Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter have executed an annexation agreement governing the municipality's eventual annexation of the territory. The municipality may incorporate any of the terms of the annexation agreement into the ordinance or resolution described by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.005. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC PURPOSE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public purpose and benefit.

(b) The district is created to accomplish the purposes of:

(1) a municipal utility district as provided by general law and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution; and

(2) Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, that relate to the construction, acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.006. INITIAL DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is initially composed of the territory described by Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter.

(b) The boundaries and field notes contained in Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter form a closure. A mistake made in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect the district's:

(1) organization, existence, or validity;

(2) right to issue any type of bond for the purposes for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on a bond;

(3) right to impose a tax; or

(4) legality or operation.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8315.051. GOVERNING BODY; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five elected directors.

(b) Except as provided by Section 8315.052, directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.052. TEMPORARY DIRECTORS. (a) On or after the effective date of the Act creating this chapter, the owner or owners of a majority of the assessed value of the real property in the district may submit a petition to the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality requesting that the commission appoint as temporary directors the five persons named in the petition. The commission shall appoint as temporary directors the five persons named in the petition.

(b) Temporary directors serve until the earlier of:

(1) the date permanent directors are elected under Section 8315.003; or

(2) the fourth anniversary of the effective date of the Act creating this chapter.

(c) If permanent directors have not been elected under Section 8315.003 and the terms of the temporary directors have expired, successor temporary directors shall be appointed or reappointed as provided by Subsection (d) to serve terms that expire on the earlier of:

(1) the date permanent directors are elected under Section 8315.003; or

(2) the fourth anniversary of the date of the appointment or reappointment.

(d) If Subsection (c) applies, the owner or owners of a majority of the assessed value of the real property in the district may submit a petition to the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality requesting that the commission appoint as successor temporary directors the five persons named in the petition. The commission shall appoint as successor temporary directors the five persons named in the petition.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8315.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the district is created.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.102. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.103. AUTHORITY FOR ROAD PROJECTS. Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may design, acquire, construct, finance, issue bonds for, improve, operate, maintain, and convey to this state, a county, or a municipality for operation and maintenance macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.104. ROAD STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS. (a) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulations of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the road project is located.

(b) If a road project is not located in the corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, the road project must meet all applicable construction standards, subdivision requirements, and regulations of each county in which the road project is located.

(c) If the state will maintain and operate the road, the Texas Transportation Commission must approve the plans and specifications of the road project.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.105. COMPLIANCE WITH MUNICIPAL CONSENT ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION. (a) The district shall comply with all applicable requirements of any ordinance or resolution that is adopted under Section 54.016 or 54.0165, Water Code, and that consents to the creation of the district or to the inclusion of land in the district.

(b) In addition to all the rights and remedies provided by other law, if the district violates the terms of an ordinance or resolution described by Subsection (a), the municipality is entitled to injunctive relief or a writ of mandamus issued by a court requiring the district and the district's officials to observe and comply with the terms of the ordinance or resolution.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.106. ANNEXATION OF DISTRICT BY MUNICIPALITY. (a) A municipality may annex all or part of the territory of the district or any new district created by the division of the district only as provided by an annexation agreement described by Section 8315.004(b).

(b) A municipality is not required to annex any part of the district's territory that is outside the corporate boundaries of the municipality.

(c) A municipality is not required to assume control and operation of the district or a new district created by division of the district on annexation of all or part of the territory of the district or new district, but the municipality may assume control and operation of the district or a new district and dissolve the district or new district if:

(1) the municipality has annexed all of the territory of the district or new district;

(2) the water and wastewater facilities required to serve at least 95 percent of the lots in the district or new district, as set out by a final plat, have been completed; and

(3) the municipality has complied with the requirements of Section 43.075, Local Government Code.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 54.016(f)(2), Water Code, a contract between a municipality and the district or new district that provides for the allocation of the taxes or revenues of the district and the municipality following the date of inclusion of all or part of the district's territory in the corporate limits of the municipality, may provide that the total annual ad valorem taxes collected by the municipality and the district from taxable property in the district may exceed the city's ad valorem tax on the property.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.107. LIMITATION ON CREATION OF OTHER MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS. Before December 31, 2011, the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality may not grant a petition under Chapter 54, Water Code, to create a municipal utility district if the district contains any territory described by Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.108. LIMITATION ON ANNEXATION OF LAND BY DISTRICT. (a) The district or any new district created by the division of the district may not annex land unless:

(1) the owner or owners of the land have provided written consent to the annexation; and

(2) the land is adjacent to the district or new district.

(b) The district must complete an annexation authorized by this section not later than the first anniversary of the date the district or new district receives written consent from the owner or owners of the land.

(c) An owner of land may revoke the owner's consent to annexation before the annexation is completed by notifying the district or new district in writing that the consent is revoked.

(d) For purposes of this section, a petition by an owner of land for annexation to the district that meets the requirements of Chapter 49, Water Code, satisfies the requirement of written consent under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.109. LIMITATION ON USE OF EMINENT DOMAIN. The district may not exercise the power of eminent domain outside the district to acquire a site or easement for:

(1) a road project authorized by Section 8315.103; or

(2) a recreational facility as defined by Section 49.462, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.110. DIVISION OF DISTRICT. (a) The district may be divided into two or more new districts only if the district:

(1) has no outstanding bonded debt; and

(2) is not imposing ad valorem taxes.

(b) This chapter applies to any new district created by the division of the district, and a new district has all the powers and duties of the district.

(c) Any new district created by the division of the district may not, at the time the new district is created, contain any land outside the area described by Section 2 of the Act creating this chapter.

(d) The board, on its own motion or on receipt of a petition signed by the owner or owners of a majority of the assessed value of the real property in the district, may adopt an order dividing the district.

(e) The board may adopt an order dividing the district before or after the date the board holds an election under Section 8315.003 to confirm the district's creation.

(f) An order dividing the district shall:

(1) name each new district;

(2) include the metes and bounds description of the territory of each new district;

(3) appoint temporary directors for each new district or provide that the owner or owners of a majority of the assessed value of the real property in each new district may submit a petition to the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality requesting that the commission appoint as temporary directors the five persons named in the petition; and

(4) provide for the division of assets and liabilities between or among the new districts.

(g) On or before the 30th day after the date of adoption of an order dividing the district, the district shall file the order with the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality and record the order in the real property records of each county in which the district is located.

(h) Any new district created by the division of the district shall hold a confirmation and directors' election as required by Section 8315.003. A new district that is not confirmed is subject to dissolution under general law.

(i) Municipal consent to the creation of the district and to the inclusion of land in the district granted under Section 8315.004 acts as municipal consent to the creation of any new district created by the division of the district and to the inclusion of land in the new district.

(j) Any new district created by the division of the district must hold an election as required by this chapter to obtain voter approval before the district may impose a maintenance tax or issue bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER D. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8315.151. ELECTIONS REGARDING TAXES OR BONDS. (a) The district may issue, without an election, bonds and other obligations secured by:

(1) revenue other than ad valorem taxes; or

(2) contract payments described by Section 8315.153.

(b) The district must hold an election in the manner provided by Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, to obtain voter approval before the district may impose an ad valorem tax or issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes.

(c) The district may not issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes to finance a road project unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.152. OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE TAX. (a) If authorized at an election held under Section 8315.151, the district may impose an operation and maintenance tax on taxable property in the district in accordance with Section 49.107, Water Code.

(b) The board shall determine the tax rate. The rate may not exceed the rate approved at the election.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.153. CONTRACT TAXES. (a) In accordance with Section 49.108, Water Code, the district may impose a tax other than an operation and maintenance tax and use the revenue derived from the tax to make payments under a contract after the provisions of the contract have been approved by a majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b) A contract approved by the district voters may contain a provision stating that the contract may be modified or amended by the board without further voter approval.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER E. BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS

Sec. 8315.201. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. The district may issue bonds or other obligations payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, impact fees, revenue, contract payments, grants, or other district money, or any combination of those sources, to pay for any authorized district purpose.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.202. TAXES FOR BONDS.At the time the district issues bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, the board shall provide for the annual imposition of a continuing direct ad valorem tax, without limit as to rate or amount, while all or part of the bonds are outstanding as required and in the manner provided by Sections 54.601 and 54.602, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 8315.203. BONDS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. At the time of issuance, the total principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance road projects and payable from ad valorem taxes may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 4719), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.